sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
abrile/X po:nùmene
Abrutzu/X po:nùmene pròpiu
acaessende/P po:verbu st:acaèssere 
acaèssere/P po:verbu
acaesset/P po:verbu st:acaèssere 
ACI/X po:acrònimu
Acròpoli/X po:nùmene pròpiu
àere/O po:verbu
aere/O po:verbu st:àere 
Afgànistan/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Àfrica/X po:nùmene pròpiu
agigu/X po:avèrbiu
aia/O po:verbu st:àere 
Albania/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Algeria/X po:nùmene pròpiu
alguerés/X po:agetivu
aloe/X po:nùmene
àloe/X po:nùmene
anàlisi/X po:nùmene
ànanas/X po:nùmene
Angola/X po:nùmene pròpiu
annuare/P po:verbu
annuende/P po:verbu st:annuare 
apàrpidu/X po:nùmene
apo/O po:verbu st:àere 
apriscàtulas/X po:nùmene
Aràbia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Ararat/X po:nùmene pròpiu
arbeschende/P po:verbu st:arbèschere 
arbèschere/P po:verbu
arbeschet/P po:verbu st:arbèschere 
Arcàdia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Àrdia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Argentina/X po:nùmene pròpiu
argiolas/X po:nùmene
Armènia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
AR/X po:acrònimu
assutapilos/X po:nùmene
astrare/P po:verbu
astrende/P po:verbu st:astrare 
ATI/X po:acrònimu
Austràlia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Àustria/X po:nùmene pròpiu
autostop/X po:nùmene
avena/X po:nùmene
chilighiare/P po:verbu
chilighiende/P po:verbu st:chilighiare 
Egeu/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Egitu/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Emìlia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
èssere/O po:verbu
essere/O po:verbu st:èssere 
Estònia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
est/X po:nùmene
ètere/X po:nùmene
Etiòpia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Etna/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Etrùria/X po:nùmene pròpiu
eucaliptus/X po:nùmene
Europa/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Èverest/X po:nùmene pròpiu
extra/X po:nùmene
ex/X po:nùmene
fia/O po:verbu st:èssere 
frocare/P po:verbu
frocende/P po:verbu st:frocare 
grandinare/P po:verbu
grandinende/P po:verbu st:grandinare 
ICI/X po:acrònimu
IGP/X po:acrònimu
incràs/X po:nùmene
Ìndia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Indonèsia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Inghilterra/X po:nùmene pròpiu
interramortos/X po:nùmene
ìpsilon/X po:nùmene
Iran/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Iraq/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Irlanda/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Iscandinàvia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
iscì/X po:nùmene
Iscòtzia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
iscurigare/P po:verbu
iscurigende/P po:verbu st:iscurigare 
islam/X po:nùmene
Islovàchia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Islovènia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Ispagna/X po:nùmene pròpiu
isprint/X po:nùmene
istadu/O po:verbu st:èssere 
Isvètzia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Itàlia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
iter/X po:nùmene
iva/X po:acrònimu
IVA/X po:acrònimu
lampare/P po:verbu
lampende/P po:verbu st:lampare 
landirare/P po:verbu
landirende/P po:verbu st:landirare 
lentorare/P po:verbu
lentorende/P po:verbu st:lentorare 
niare/P po:verbu
niende/P po:verbu st:niare 
oblò/X po:nùmene
Ogiastra/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Olanda/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Olimpu/X po:nùmene pròpiu
onniasantu/X po:nùmene
Ossètzia/X po:nùmene pròpiu
otzales/X po:nùmene
proende/P po:verbu st:pròere 
pròere/P po:verbu
proet/P po:verbu st:pròere 
rosinare/P po:verbu
rosinende/P po:verbu st:rosinare 
so/O po:verbu st:èssere 
sutzedende/P po:verbu st:sutzèdere 
sutzèdere/P po:verbu
sutzedet/P po:verbu st:sutzèdere 
tronare/P po:verbu
tronende/P po:verbu st:tronare 
Ucràina/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Uganda/X po:nùmene pròpiu
ullieras/X po:nùmene
Ùmbria/X po:nùmene pròpiu
ùndighi/X po:numerale
Ungheria/X po:nùmene pròpiu
uràniu/X po:nùmene
Uruguay/X po:nùmene pròpiu
Uzbèchistan/X po:nùmene pròpiu
